Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
ARTICLE 22.5
INMATE AND PAROLE TIME COMPUTATION

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1979. This article was repealed and reenacted in 1984, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1984, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Section

PART 1 APPLICABILITY

PART 2 OFFENDERS SENTENCED FOR
CRIMES COMMITTED PRIOR TO
JULY 1, 1979

PART 3 OFFENDERS SENTENCED FOR
CRIMES COMMITTED ON OR
AFTER JULY 1, 1979

PART 4 PAROLE ELIGIBILITY AND
DISCHARGE FROM CUSTODY